Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska39-2308
Class B license; term; renewal; fee.

Any person satisfactorily completing the examination required by section 39-2307 or exempt from such examination under subsection (2) of section 39-2306 shall be issued a Class B license as a county highway and city street superintendent. Such license shall be valid for a period of three years and shall be renewable upon the payment of a fee of thirty dollars.

Laws 1969, c. 144, § 8, p. 668;

Laws 2003, LB 500, § 8;

Laws 2018, LB733, § 1;

Laws 2021, LB174, § 9.